Illinois, session 104th, HB471.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Student Loan Servicing Rights Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 992/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Student Loan Servicing Rights Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-540, eff. 12-31-18.)